Massachusetts, session 194th, H3806.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 11 of Chapter 89 as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended, in line 3 by striking out the word “pedestrian” and inserting in place thereof,
the words “vulnerable user as defined by in Section 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws”
SECTION 2: Said Section 11 of Chapter 89, is hereby amended, in lines 5, 7, 11, 12, and
18 by striking out the word “pedestrian” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
words “vulnerable user”
SECTION 3: Said Section 11 of Chapter 89, is hereby amended, in line 4 by striking out
the words “crosswalk marked” and inserting in place thereof, the words “marked crossing”
SECTION 4: Said Section 11 of Chapter 89, is hereby amended, in line 13 by striking out
the words “crosswalk” and inserting in place thereof, the words “marked crossing”
of 2

SECTION 5: Said Section 11 of Chapter 89, is hereby amended, in line 11, 12, and 18 by
striking out the words “crosswalk” and inserting in place thereof, the words “crossing”
of 2